Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2017.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2153.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2153.01. Website information; agencies providing support for pregnant women; adoption information A. On or before February 1, 2022 December 1, 2026, the department of health services and the Arizona health care cost containment system shall provide on the department's public website home page for each agency a conspicuous link that directs an individual to the following easily comprehensible information, in both English and Spanish: 1. A list of public and private agencies and services available to assist a woman through pregnancy, on childbirth and while her child is dependent. Any agency that counsels, refers, performs, induces, prescribes or provides any means for abortion may not be included on the list. 2. Each agency's services, physical address, telephone number and website address, if available. 3. Information on and a link to a separate featured webpage that is accessible by redirecting from the domain name AdoptionOption.AZ.gov and that lists all of the following: (a) Public and nonprofit adoption agencies that are not affiliated with an abortion provider and that are arranged geographically. The link shall include the information specified in paragraph 2 of this subsection. (b) Easily comprehensible first steps to assist a pregnant woman seeking to confidentially explore the option of placing her child for adoption. (c) Whether the adoption agency allows the woman to choose the adoptive parents. (d) Agencies that offer obstetric ultrasounds free of charge. (e) Agencies that offer confidential counseling free of charge to a woman considering placing her child for adoption. B. All information provided pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be available in an easily downloadable printed format. END_STATUTE